Massachusetts, session 194th, S1458.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 39A of chapter 129 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is amended by striking the second paragraph and inserting in place thereof the
following:-
"This section shall not apply to a publicly or privately owned zoological park, a research
institution as defined in section 136A of chapter 140, or to horse or cattle auctions.".
of 1